src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_heeitug_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - heeitug:
    heeitug+A+Sg+Nom: heeitug
    heeitug+A+Attr: heitugis
    heeitug+A+Sg+Gen: heittug
    heeitug+A+Sg+Acc: heittug
    heeitug+A+Sg+Ill: heitugân
    heeitug+A+Sg+Loc: heitugist
    heeitug+A+Sg+Com: heitugáin
    heeitug+A+Sg+Abe: heittugttáá
    heeitug+A+Ess: heitugin
    heeitug+A+Par: heitugid
    heeitug+A+Pl+Nom: heitugeh
    heeitug+A+Pl+Gen: heitugij
    heeitug+A+Pl+Acc: heitugijd
    heeitug+A+Pl+Ill: heitugáid
    heeitug+A+Pl+Loc: heitugijn
    heeitug+A+Pl+Com: [heitugijguin, heitugijgijn]
    heeitug+A+Pl+Abe: heitugijttáá

    heeitug+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: heittugub

    heeitug+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: heittugumos
